California, session 20252026, AB862.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 47606.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:47606.5.(a)On or before July 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the governing body of a charter school shall hold a public hearing to adopt a local control and accountability plan using a template adopted by the state board. The governing body of a charter school shall update the goals and annual actions to achieve those goals identified in the charter petition pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, using the template for the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and shall include all of the following:(1)A review of the progress toward the goals included in the charter, an assessment of the effectiveness of the specific actions described in the charter toward achieving the goals, and a description of changes to the specific actions the charter school will make as a result of the review and assessment.(2)A listing and description of the expenditures for the fiscal year implementing the specific actions included in the charter as a result of the reviews and assessment required by paragraph (1).(b)For purposes of the review required by subdivision (a), a governing body of a charter school may consider qualitative information, including, but not limited to, findings that result from school quality reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52052 or any other reviews.(c)To the extent practicable, data reported pursuant to this section shall be reported in a manner consistent with how information is reported on the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5 and shall include both of the following percentages for use on the California School Dashboard:(1)The percentage of pupils who intend to enroll in a two-year or four-year college.(2)The percentage of pupils who intend to enter or be employed through a registered apprenticeship program, skilled trade, or industry-aligned career pathway, including, but not limited to, industrial trades, construction trades, or cosmetology.(d)The charter school shall consult with teachers, principals, administrators, other school personnel, parents, and pupils in developing the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan.(e)(1)The charter school shall present a report on the annual update to the local control and accountability plan and the local control funding formula budget overview for parents on or before February 28 of each year as part of a nonconsent item at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body of the charter school.(2)The report shall include both of the following:(A)All available midyear outcome data related to metrics identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.(B)All available midyear expenditure and implementation data on all actions identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.(f)The governing body of a charter school shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit the recommendations and comments of members of the public regarding the specific actions and expenditures proposed to be included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. The agenda for the public hearing shall be posted at least 72 hours before the public hearing, and the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan shall be made available for public inspection at each site operated by the charter school.(g)The governing body of a charter school may adopt revisions to a local control and accountability plan during the period the local control and accountability plan is in effect. The governing body of a charter school may only adopt a revision to a local control and accountability plan if it follows the process to adopt a local control and accountability plan pursuant to this section and the revisions are adopted in a public meeting.(h)Pursuant to Section 47604.33, the charter school shall submit the adopted or revised local control and accountability plan pursuant to this section to its chartering authority and the county superintendent of schools, or only to the county superintendent of schools if the county board of education is the chartering authority.(i)The charter school shall prominently post on the home page of the internet website of the charter school any local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing body of the charter school, and any updates, revisions, or addenda, including those to comply with federal law, to a local control and accountability plan approved by the governing body of the charter school.SEC. 2.Section 52060 of the Education Code is amended to read:52060.(a)On or before July 1, 2014, the governing board of each school district shall adopt a local control and accountability plan using a template adopted by the state board.(b)A local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of a school district shall be effective for a period of three years, and shall be updated on or before July 1 of each year.(c)A local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of a school district shall include, for the school district and each school within the school district, all of the information specified in the template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064.(d)All of the following are state priorities for purposes of a school district’s local control and accountability plan:(1)The degree to which the teachers of the school district are appropriately assigned in accordance with Section 44258.9, and fully credentialed in the subject areas, and, for the pupils they are teaching, every pupil in the school district has sufficient access to the standards-aligned instructional materials as determined pursuant to Section 60119, and school facilities are maintained in good repair, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.(2)Implementation of the academic content and performance standards adopted by the state board, including how the programs and services will enable English learners to access the common core academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 and the English language development standards adopted pursuant to former Section 60811.3, as that section read on June 30, 2013, or former Section 60811.4, as that section read on June 30, 2016, for purposes of gaining academic content knowledge and English language proficiency.(3)(A)Parental involvement and family engagement, including efforts the school district makes to seek parent input in making decisions for the school district and each individual schoolsite, and including how the school district will promote parental participation in programs for unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs.(B)Family engagement may include, but need not be limited to, efforts by the school district and each individual schoolsite to apply research-based practices, such as welcoming all families into the school community, engaging in effective two-way communication, supporting pupil success, and empowering families to advocate for equity and access. Family engagement may include, but need not be limited to, treating families as partners to inform, influence, and create practices and programs that support pupil success and collaboration with families and the broader community, expand pupil learning opportunities and community services, and promote civic participation.(4)Pupil achievement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:(A)Statewide assessments administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 or any subsequent assessment, as certified by the state board.(B)The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for entrance to the University of California and the California State University.(C)The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for career technical education sequences or programs of study that align with state board-approved career technical education standards and frameworks, including, but not limited to, those described in subdivision (a) of Section 52302, subdivision (a) of Section 52372.5, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 54692.(D)The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed both types of courses described in subparagraphs (B) and (C).(E)The percentage of English learner pupils who make progress toward English proficiency as measured by the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California or any subsequent assessment of English proficiency, as certified by the state board.(F)The English learner reclassification rate.(G)The percentage of pupils who have passed an advanced placement examination with a score of 3 or higher.(H)The percentage of pupils who demonstrate college preparedness pursuant to the Early Assessment Program, as described in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 99300) of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3, or any subsequent assessment of college preparedness.(I)The percentage of pupils who intend to enroll in a two-year or four-year college.(J)The percentage of pupils who intend to enter or be employed through a registered apprenticeship program, skilled trade, or industry-aligned career pathway, including, but not limited to, industrial trades, construction trades, or cosmetology.(5)Pupil engagement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:(A)School attendance rates.(B)Chronic absenteeism rates.(C)Middle school dropout rates.(D)High school dropout rates.(E)High school graduation rates.(6)School climate, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:(A)Pupil suspension rates.(B)Pupil expulsion rates.(C)Other local measures, including surveys of pupils, parents, and teachers on the sense of safety and school connectedness.(7)The extent to which pupils have access to, and are enrolled in, a broad course of study that includes all of the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable, including the programs and services developed and provided to unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs, and the programs and services that are provided to benefit these pupils as a result of the funding received pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.(8)Pupil outcomes, if available, in the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable.(e)For purposes of the descriptions required by subdivision (b) of Section 52064, the governing board of a school district may consider qualitative information, including, but not limited to, findings that result from school quality reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52052 or any other reviews.(f)To the extent practicable, data reported in a local control and accountability plan shall be reported in a manner consistent with how information is reported on the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5.(g)The governing board of a school district shall consult with teachers, principals, administrators, other school personnel, local bargaining units of the school district, parents, and pupils in developing a local control and accountability plan.(h)A school district may identify local priorities, goals in regard to the local priorities, and the method for measuring the school district’s progress toward achieving those goals.SEC. 3.SECTION 1. Section 52064.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:52064.6. (a)On or before July 1, 2027, Upon the next revision of the California School Dashboard, the state board shall include consider the inclusion of both of the following data related to a pupil’s chosen path after high school for the College/Career Indicator associated with the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5:(1)(a) The percentage of pupils who intend to enroll in a two-year or four-year college.(2)(b) The percentage of pupils who intend to enter or be employed through a registered apprenticeship program, skilled trade, or industry-aligned career pathway, including, but not limited to, industrial trades, construction trades, or cosmetology.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools give equal weight and emphasis to different pathways that a pupil may seek after high school, including enrolling in a college or entering or being employed through a registered apprenticeship program, skilled trade, or industry-aligned career pathway.SEC. 4.SEC. 2. Section 52066 of the Education Code is amended to read:52066. (a) On or before July 1, 2014, each county superintendent of schools shall develop, and present to the county board of education for adoption, a local control and accountability plan using a template adopted by the state board.(b) A local control and accountability plan adopted by a county board of education shall be effective for a period of three years, and shall be updated on or before July 1 of each year.(c) A local control and accountability plan adopted by a county board of education shall include, for each school or program operated by the county superintendent of schools, all of the information specified in the template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064.(d) All of the following are state priorities for purposes of a county board of education’s local control and accountability plan:(1) The degree to which the teachers in the schools or programs operated by the county superintendent of schools are appropriately assigned in accordance with Section 44258.9 and fully credentialed in the subject areas, and, for the pupils they are teaching, every pupil in the schools or programs operated by the county superintendent of schools has sufficient access to the standards-aligned instructional materials as determined pursuant to Section 60119, and school facilities are maintained in good repair as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.(2) Implementation of the academic content and performance standards adopted by the state board, including how the programs and services will enable English learners to access the common core academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 and the English language development standards adopted pursuant to former Section 60811.3, as that section read on June 30, 2013, or former Section 60811.4, as that section read on June 30, 2016, for purposes of gaining academic content knowledge and English language proficiency.(3) (A) Parental involvement and family engagement, including efforts the county superintendent of schools makes to seek parent input in making decisions for each individual schoolsite and program operated by a county superintendent of schools, and including how the county superintendent of schools will promote parental participation in programs for unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs.(B) Family engagement may include, but need not be limited to, efforts by the county superintendent of schools and each individual schoolsite to apply research-based practices, such as welcoming all families into the school community, engaging in effective two-way communication, supporting pupil success, and empowering families to advocate for equity and access. Family engagement may include, but need not be limited to, treating families as partners to inform, influence, and create practices and programs that support pupil success and collaboration with families and the broader community, expand pupil learning opportunities and community services, and promote civic participation.(4) Pupil achievement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:(A) Statewide assessments administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 or any subsequent assessment, as certified by the state board.(B) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for entrance to the University of California and the California State University.(C) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for career technical education sequences or programs of study that align with state board-approved career technical education standards and frameworks, including, but not limited to, those described in subdivision (a) of Section 52302, subdivision (a) of Section 52372.5, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 54692.(D) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed both types of courses described in subparagraphs (B) and (C).(E) The percentage of English learner pupils who make progress toward English proficiency as measured by the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California or any subsequent assessment of English proficiency, as certified by the state board.(F) The English learner reclassification rate.(G) The percentage of pupils who have passed an advanced placement examination with a score of 3 or higher.(H) The percentage of pupils who demonstrate college preparedness pursuant to the Early Assessment Program, as described in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 99300) of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3, or any subsequent assessment of college preparedness.(I)The percentage of pupils who intend to enroll in a two-year or four-year college.(J)The percentage of pupils who intend to enter or be employed through a registered apprenticeship program, skilled trade, or industry-aligned career pathway, including, but not limited to, industrial trades, construction trades, or cosmetology.(5) Pupil engagement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:(A) School attendance rates.(B) Chronic absenteeism rates.(C) Middle school dropout rates.(D) High school dropout rates.(E) High school graduation rates.(6) School climate, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:(A) Pupil suspension rates.(B) Pupil expulsion rates.(C) (i) Other local measures, including surveys of pupils, parents, and teachers on the sense of safety and school connectedness.(ii) Commencing with the 2026–27 school year, the following local measurement of a pupil’s intended chosen path after high school:(I) The percentage of pupils who intend to enroll in a two-year or four-year college.(II) The percentage of pupils who intend to enter or be employed through a registered apprenticeship program, skilled trade, or industry-aligned career pathway, including, but not limited to, industrial trades, construction trades, or cosmetology.(7) The extent to which pupils have access to, and are enrolled in, a broad course of study that includes all of the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable, including the programs and services developed and provided to unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs, and the programs and services that are provided to benefit these pupils as a result of the funding received pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.(8) Pupil outcomes, if available, in the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable.(9) How the county superintendent of schools will coordinate instruction of expelled pupils pursuant to Section 48926.(10) How the county superintendent of schools will coordinate services for foster children, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Working with the county child welfare agency to minimize changes in school placement.(B) Providing education-related information to the county child welfare agency to assist the county child welfare agency in the delivery of services to foster children, including, but not limited to, educational status and progress information that is required to be included in court reports.(C) Responding to requests from the juvenile court for information and working with the juvenile court to ensure the delivery and coordination of necessary educational services.(D) Establishing a mechanism for the efficient expeditious transfer of health and education records and the health and education passport.(e) For purposes of the descriptions required by subdivision (b) of Section 52064, a county board of education may consider qualitative information, including, but not limited to, findings that result from school quality reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52052 or any other reviews.(f) To the extent practicable, data reported in a local control and accountability plan shall be reported in a manner consistent with how information is reported on the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5.(g) The county superintendent of schools shall consult with teachers, principals, administrators, other school personnel, local bargaining units of the county office of education, parents, and pupils in developing a local control and accountability plan.(h) A county board of education may identify local priorities, goals in regard to the local priorities, and the method for measuring the county office of education’s progress toward achieving those goals.(i) (1) Beginning with the 2018–19 fiscal year and in each fiscal year thereafter, a county superintendent of schools shall prepare a summary of how the county superintendent of schools plans to support school districts and schools within the county in implementing this article and present the summary to the county board of education at the same public meeting required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 52068. The summary shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:(A) A description of how the county superintendent of schools will support the continuous improvement of all school districts within the county, including steps that the county superintendent of schools plans to take to collaborate with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the department, the lead agencies specified in Sections 52073 and 52073.1, and other county superintendents of schools to support school districts and schools within the county in implementing this article.(B) A description of how the county superintendent of schools will assist each school district identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 and each charter school identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 in improving pupil outcomes, including, at a minimum, clearly identifying the activities being performed by the county office of education and the source of funding for those activities. This description shall include the actions the school district and charter school will take independent of the county superintendent of schools to improve pupil outcomes pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 52071 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3.(C) One or more goals for each of the following:(i) Completing the review of local control and accountability plans submitted by school districts pursuant to Section 52070.(ii) Providing technical assistance to school districts pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 52071 and charter schools pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3.(iii) Providing any other support to school districts and schools within the county in implementing this article.(iv) Providing support to school districts in developing and implementing the addendum specified in Section 52064.3.(D) One or more metrics to assess progress toward each goal identified in subparagraph (C).(E) Specific actions and related expenditures to achieve each goal identified in subparagraph (C), to the extent this information is not provided pursuant to subparagraph (B). The specific actions shall not supersede the provisions of existing local collective bargaining agreements within the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools.(2) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year and in each fiscal year thereafter, the county superintendent of schools shall submit the summary described in this subdivision with its local control and accountability plan pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52070.5.(3) On or before November 1 of each year, the department shall compile the information provided by county superintendents of schools pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) into a single document and shall make this report available to the public on the department’s internet website.SEC. 5.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.